src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON CELSIUS_UNASS_CMP_INFL 
 
                   +Sg+Nom:%>         K-VOW                    ;
                          :a%>        ILL-EVENCASE         ;
                          :a%>        N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
                      +Ess:an         K-CONS                   ;
                      +Ess:an%>       PxC                  ; !
                +Cmp/SgNom:%>         R                    ;
                +Cmp/SgGen:a%>        R                    ;
                +Cmp/PlGen:a%>j       R                    ;
                      +Abe:a%>dak     K-CONS                   ;
               +Abe+Use/NG:a%>da      K-VOW                    ;
                          :a»         DenominalNounsMUORRA ;


!!€gt-norm: aids # Even-syllable test
!!€ aids:                 aids+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ aidsaj:               aids+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ aidsas:               aids+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ aidsan:               aids+N+Ess
!!€ aidsadak:             aids+N+Abe
!!€ aidsada:             aids+N+Abe 
!!€ aidsasj:              aids+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom



!LEXICON MEGABYTE_UNASS
! +OLang/NOB+Use/NotDNorm:          MEGABYTE_UNASS_CMP_INFL ;
!
!LEXICON MEGABYTE_UNASS_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Unassimilated loanwords. on -e. Really just norwegian/english words with a kind of sami inflection. Code-switching. Presently no words in this lexicon
!                +Cmp/SgNom:e%>       R                       ;
!                +Cmp/SgGen:a%>       R                       ;
!                +Cmp/PlGen:a%>j      R                       ;
!                   +Sg+Nom:e%>       K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Nom:a%>       PxV                     ; !
!                   +Sg+Ill:a%>j      K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Gen:a%>       K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Acc:a%>v      K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Ine:a%>n      K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Ela:a%>s      K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Nom:a%>       K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Gen:a%>j      K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Acc:a%>jt     K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Ill:a%>jda    K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Ine:a%>jn     K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Ela:a%>js     K                       ;
!                   +Pl+Com:a%>j      K                       ;
!                   +Sg+Gen:a%>       PxV                     ; ! Possessive suffix
!                   +Sg+Acc:a%>       PxV                     ; !
!                   +Sg+Ill:a%>s%>    PxCi                    ; !
!                   +Sg+Ine:a%>n%>    PxC                     ; !
!                   +Sg+Ela:a%>st%>   PxC                     ; !
!                   +Pl+Nom:a%>       PxNomPlV                ; !
!                   +Pl+Gen:a%>j%>    PxC                     ; !
!                   +Pl+Acc:a%>jd%>   PxC                     ; !
!                   +Pl+Ill:a%>jdis%> PxCs                    ; !
!                   +Pl+Ine:a%>jn%>   PxC                     ; !
!                   +Pl+Ela:a%>jst%>  PxC                     ; !
!                   +Pl+Com:a%>j%>    PxC                     ; !
!                      +Ess:a%>n      K                       ;
!                      +Abe:a%>dak    K                       ;
!                      +Abe:a%>da     K                       ;
!                          :a%>       N-EVENWEAKSTEM-SG-COM   ;
!           +Der1+Der/Car+A:a»        DIBME                   ;
!      +Der1+Der/Car+A+Attr:a»dis%>   ATTR                    ;
!           +Der1+Der/Car+A:a»d       DUVVAT                  ;
! ! +Der1+Der/Car+A:e»dis VUOHTA ; !moved to ATTR
!! +Der4+Der/ahtes:e»g AHTES ; Only for odd-syllble stems
! ! +Der4+Der/ahtes:e»d AHTES ;




!! ### 4syll stems 
! - - - - - -

LEXICON GÅNÅGIS !!= @CODE@ Standard C-final 4-syllabic stems
 :ss     GÅNÅGIS-C            ;
 :ssa%>  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ;
 :ssa»Q1 DenominalNounsMUORRA ; !Gives diminutive, and double diminutive
 
 +Err/Orth:sa GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;

!!€gt-norm: rahtjamus # Even-syllable test
!!€ rahtjamus:                 rahtjamus+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ rahtjamussaj:                 rahtjamus+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ rahtjamusás:                 rahtjamus+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON GÅNÅGIS-C
                           +Sg+Nom:%>             K-CONS              ;
                        +Cmp/SgNom:%>             R              ;
                        +Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1          R              ;
                        +Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j         R              ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Attr:a»Q1#gahtes%> ATTR ; !wrong
!              +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahtá%>   K              ;
!              +Der4+Der/ahtes+Adv:a»Q1#gahti%>   K              ;
!         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahtes%>  K              ;
!         +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom:a»Q1#gahttá%>  PxV            ; !^P^
!            +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Ess:a»Q1#gahttá%>n K              ;
! +Der4+Der/ahtes+A+Der5+Der/vuota:a»Q1#gahtes    VUOHTA         ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
!                +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>  ILL-EVENCASE   ;
!                +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
!                +Der4+Der/ahtes+A:a»Q1#gahttá%>  BU/MUS         ;


LEXICON GÅNÅGIS-EVEN
         :Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM        ;
              ILL-EVENCASE          ;
     +Ess:n   K-CONS                    ;
  +Sg+Nom:    PxV                   ; ! !Spiik not explicit here, thus guessing.
!    +Ess:n%> PxC                   ; !^P^ !No Ess+Px according to Spiik, Grundstrom


LEXICON BERULASJ !!= @CODE@ For words ending on -asj. Same as GÅNÅGIS but with strong essive and illative -adjtan and -adtjaj subtaged, same with PX "-adjtam". These forms are barely used today. -lahttja is also Err/Orth-taged.

 :adtj     GÅNÅGIS-C            ; 
 :adtja%>  BERULASJ-EVEN        ;
 :adtja»Q1 DenominalNounsMUORRA ;

 +Err/Orth+Cmp/SgGen:ahttja%>          R                    ; ! Err/Orth -ahttja
 +Err/Orth+Cmp/PlGen:ahttja%>j         R                    ; ! Err/Orth -ahttja 
           +Err/Orth:ahttja%>          BERULASJ-EVEN        ; ! Err/Orth -ahttja
           +Err/Orth:ahttja»           DenominalNounsMUORRA ; ! Err/Orth -ahttja



LEXICON BERULASJ-EVEN 
              +Ess:Q1n K-CONS                    ; ! Q1 to avoid -dtj- consonant center
                  :Q1  ILL-EVENCASE          ; ! Q1 to avoid -dtj- consonant center
                  :Q1  N-EVENWEAKSTEM-NO-ABE ; ! Q1 to avoid -dtj- consonant center
           +Sg+Nom:Q1  PxV                   ; ! Spiik not explicit here, thus guessing.
  +Err/Orth+Sg+Nom:    PxV                   ; ! Spiik not explicit here, thus guessing.
     +Err/Orth+Ess:n   K-CONS                    ;
         +Err/Orth:    ILL-EVENCASE          ;
!             +Ess:n%> PxC                   ; !^P^ !No Ess+Px according to Spiik, Grundstrom

LEXICON BEDNAGASJ !!= @CODE@ Like BERULASJ, but for derived nouns in diminutive. No cg, no vowchange, no short Ess. Has only one dimin derivation since these words already are dimin, ie. no double dim as for GAHPER. No abessive, not totally sure about this, I think we must use postposition dagi when it's diminutive,
    +Gram/Dimin+Sg+Nom:%>     K-VOW                       ;
 +Gram/Dimin+Cmp/SgNom:%>     R                       ;
 +Gram/Dimin+Cmp/SgGen:a%>Q1  R                       ;
 +Gram/Dimin+Cmp/PlGen:a%>Q1j R                       ;
           +Gram/Dimin:a%>    BERULASJ-EVEN           ;
           +Gram/Dimin:a»Q1   DenominalNounsBEDNAGASJ ; ! Q1 to avoid -dtj- consonant center

!!€gt-norm: stiebil # Odd-syllable test
!!€ bednagasj:            bednagasj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ bednagattjas:         bednagasj+N+Sg+Ela
